Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2820
Action based on failure to obtain informed consent; burden of proof.

Before the plaintiff may recover any damages in any action based on failure to obtain informed consent, it shall be established by a preponderance of the evidence that a reasonably prudent person in the plaintiff's position would not have undergone the treatment had he or she been properly informed and that the lack of informed consent was the proximate cause of the injury and damages claimed.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 20;

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 4.

To be "properly informed" under this section, a patient must be informed under the standard articulated in section 44-2816. Curran v. Buser, 271 Neb. 332, 711 N.W.2d 562 (2006).

The language of this statute is adopted for the purposes of malpractice actions against chiropractors. Jones v. Malloy, 226 Neb. 559, 412 N.W.2d 837 (1987).